Washington statutes.
RCW 43.52.385

Best interest of ratepayers to determine interest of agency.

For the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to RCW 43.52.343, the best interests of all ratepayers affected by the joint operating agency and its projects shall determine the interest of the operating agency and its board.

[ 1982 1st ex.s. c 43 s 9.]

NOTES:

Severability—Savings—1982 1st ex.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.52.374.